src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
LEXICON 51
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][CASE=COMITATIVE]:Isoine-Britannioine N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:Isoitta-Britannioitta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Isoilta-Britannioilta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Isoilla-Britannioilla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Isoille-Britannioille N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:Isoista-Britannioista N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:Isoina-Britannioina N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Isojen-Britannioiden  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Isojen-Britannioitten  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Isojen-Britanniojen  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Isoissa-Britannioissa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:Isot-Britanniat  N_BACK_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:Isoja-Britannioita  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Isoiksi-Britannioikse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Isoiksi-Britannioiksi  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:Isotta-Britanniatta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Isolta-Britannialta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Isolla-Britannialla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Isolle-Britannialle N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:Isosta-Britanniasta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:Isona-Britanniana N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Ison-Britannian  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Isossa-Britanniassa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:Iso-Britannia N_BACK_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:Iso-Britannia  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:Isoa-Britanniaa  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Isoksi-Britanniakse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Isoksi-Britanniaksi  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][CASE=COMITATIVE]:Uusinemaine N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:Uusittamaitta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Uusiltamailta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Uusillamailla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Uusillemaille N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:Uusistamaista N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:Uusinamaina N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Uusienmaiden  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Uusissamaissa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:Uudetmaat  N_BACK_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:Uusiamaita  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Uusiksimaikse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Uusiksimaiksi  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:Uudettamaatta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Uudeltamaalta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Uudellamaalla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:Uudellemaalle N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:Uudestamaasta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:Uutenamaana N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:Uudenmaan  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:Uudessamaassa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:Uusimaa  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:Uuttamaata  N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Uudeksimaakse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=Uusimaa][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:Uudeksimaaksi  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][CASE=COMITATIVE]:aavoine%-%0merine N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:aavoitta%-%0merittä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:aavoilta%-%0meriltä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:aavoilla%-%0merillä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:aavoille%-%0merille N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:aavoissa%-%0merissä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:aavoina%-%0merinä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:aavojen%-%0merien N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:aavojen%-%0merten N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:aavoissa%-%0merissä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:aavat%-%0meret N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:aavoja%-%0meriä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:aavoiksi%-%0merikse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:aavoiksi%-%0meriksi N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:aavatta%-%0merettä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:aavalta%-%0mereltä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:aavalla%-%0merellä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:aavalle%-%0merelle N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:aavassa%-%0meressä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:aavana%-%0merenä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:aavan%-%0meren N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:aavassa%-%0meressä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:aava%-%0meri N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:aavaa%-%0merta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:aavaksi%-%0merekse N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=aavameri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:aavaksi%-%0mereksi N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:hienoitta%-%0sokereitta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:hienoilta%-%0sokereilta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:hienoilla%-%0sokereilla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:hienoille%-%0sokereille N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:hienoista%-%0sokereista N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:hienoina%-%0sokereina N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:hienojen%-%0sokereiden N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:hienojen%-%0sokereitten N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:hienojen%-%0sokerien N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:hienoissa%-%0sokereissa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:hienot%-%0sokerit N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:hienoja%-%0sokereja N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:hienoiksi%-%0sokereikse N_BACK_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:hienoiksi%-%0sokereiksi N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:hienotta%-%0sokeritta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:hienolta%-%0sokerilta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:hienolla%-%0sokerilla N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:hienolle%-%0sokerille N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:hienosta%-%0sokerissa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:hienona%-%0sokerina N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:hienon%-%0sokerin N_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:hienossa%-%0sokerissa N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:hieno%-%0sokeri N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:hienoa%-%0sokeria N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:hienoksi%-%0sokerikse N_BACK_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=hienosokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:hienoksi%-%0sokeriksi N_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=isojako][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:isoitta%-%0jaoitta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=isojako][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:isoilta%-%0jaoilta N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
